Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3606
Adoption of resolution; notices required.

Not later than seven days after the adoption of the resolution by the county board regarding a sewerage disposal system and plant or plants pursuant to section 23-3605, the county board shall:

(1) Send formal notice of such resolution to the clerk of each city and village located within the county and inform such clerks of its intent to establish the boundaries of each city's or village's area of future growth and development within the boundaries of the county; and

(2) Send formal notice of such resolution to any city or other political subdivision into whose sewerage disposal system and plant or plants the proposed county sewerage system will or may connect.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 6.